Massachusetts, session 194th, H4699.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1: Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, there shall be a
special commission to study and define conditions under which Single-Stair Multi-Family
Residential buildings up to six stories shall be legalized in Massachusetts. The commission shall
produce a building code amendment that allows single-stair multi-family residential buildings of
up to six stories, including measures for mitigating any adverse health and safety impacts unique
to single-stair multi-family residential buildings. Said measures mitigating any adverse health
and safety impacts would include general fire prevention measures, including smoke alarms,
sprinkler systems, fire-resistant materials, emergency exit strategies, and any safety measures
pertinent to 527 CMR 1.00.
(b) The commission shall consist of the secretary of housing and livable communities, or
their designee, who shall serve as chair, 2 members of the Massachusetts House of
Representatives, or their designees, 2 members of Massachusetts Senate, or their designees, 1
member representing the Fire Chiefs Association of Massachusetts, 2 members of the American
Institute of Architects, 1 member who is a practicing fire engineer representing the National Fire
of 2

Protection Association, 2 members representing the Board of Building Regulations and
Standards, 1 member representing the American Planning Association Massachusetts Chapter, 1
member representing the Home Builders and Remodelers Association, 1 member representing
NAIOP, 1 member representing the Center for Building in North America, 1 member
representing a building official employed by a municipality with a Class 1 Fire Department, and
1 member representing Abundant Housing Massachusetts.
(c) The study shall build on the report Legalizing Mid-Rise Single-Stair Housing in
Massachusetts produced by the Harvard Joint Center for Housing Studies, Boston Indicators, and
Utile, and shall include, but not be limited to: a technical study into the safety of single-stair
residential buildings compared to two-staircase buildings, and a process map and timeline for
implementation of drafted building code amendment.
(d) Not later than July 31, 2026, the commission shall file its study with the clerks of the
house of representatives and the senate and the joint committee on housing.
of 2